it: Design del coltello da caccia/sopravvivenza: Punto di ritaglio; Dagger; Punto di rilascio; Punta dell'ago; A penna; Sheepsfoot; Punta di lancia; Punto Spey; Punto Tanto; Tipo wharncliffe; Altro
lt-LT: Medžioklinio / turistinio peilio dizainas: „Clip point“ geležtė; Durklas; „Drop point“ geležtė; „Needle point“ geležtė; „Pen“ geležtė; „Sheepsfoot“ geležtė; „Spear point“ geležtė; „Spey point“ geležtė; „Tanto point“ geležtė; „Wharncliffe“ geležtė; Kita
ru: Конструкция охотничьего ножа или ножа для выживания: Клип-поинт; Кинжал; Дроп-поинт; Игла; Перо; Овечье копыто; Копьевидное лезвие; Спей-пойнт; Танто-поинт; Ворнклиф; Другая
tr: Avcılık/Hayatta kalma bıçağı tasarımı: Kesme noktası; Hançer; Bırakma noktası; İğne noktası; Kalem; Keçi ayaklı; Mızrak noktası; Spey noktası; Tanto noktası; Wharncliffe; Diğer
sv: Design på jakt-/överlevnadskniv: Klippunkt; Dolk; Droppunkt; Nålspets; Hage; Fårfot; Spjutspets; Spey-spets; Tantopunkt; Wharncliffe; Övrigt
nl: Ontwerp jacht-/overlevingsmes: Klempunt; Dolk; Drop point; Naaldpunt; Kooi; Schapenpoot; Speerpunt; Spey-punt; Tanto-punt; Wharncliffe; Andere
fi: Metsästys-/selviytymisveitsen suunnittelu: Clip point; Tikari; Drop point; Neulankärki; Karsina; Lampaanjalka; Keihään kärki; Spey-piste; Tanto-piste; Wharncliffe; Muu
sl-SI: Zasnova lovskega/taktičnega noža: Privzdignjena konica; Bodalo; Padajoča konica; Koničasta konica; Pisalo; Ovčja noga; Klinasto rezilo; Rezilo z odrezano konico; Tanto; Kljunasto rezilo; Drugo
en: Hunting/Survival knife design: Clip point; Dagger; Drop point; Needle point; Pen; Sheepsfoot; Spear point; Spey point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Other
fr: Conception de couteau de chasse/survie: Point de détourage; Dague; Point de détourage; Pointe d'aiguille; Enclos; Pied de mouton; Point lance; Pointe Spey; Point Tanto; Wharncliffe; Autre
pt-PT: Design de faca de caça e sobrevivência: Clip point; Punhal; Drop point; Needle point; Caneta; Sheepsfoot; Spear point; Spey point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Outro
hu: Vadász-/Túlélőkés kialakítása: Clip point; Tőr; Drop point; Needle point; Toll; Sheepsfoot; Spear point; Spey point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Egyéb
zh-CN: 猎刀设计: 尖轨; 匕首; 滴头刀尖; 针式; 小窝; 羊蹄形; 矛型; 去势刀尖; 几何刀尖; 鸟嘴形; 其他
ro-RO: Design cuțit de vânătoare/supraviețuire: Clip point; Pumnal; Drop point; Needle point; Briceag; Sheepsfoot; Spear point; Spey point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Altele
ja: ハンティング/サバイバルナイフデザイン: クリップポイント; ダガー; ドロップポイント; ニードルポイント; ペン; シープスフット; スピアポイント; スペイポイント; タントポイント; ワーンクリフ; その他
cs: Design loveckého nože: Sražená špice; Dýka; Skápnutá špice; Jehlová špička; Kapesní; Tupý hřbet; Špička kopí; Spey čepel; Tanto; Wharncliffe; Jiné
bg-BG: Дизайн на нож за лов/оцеляване: Точка на изрязване; Кинжал; Точка на пускане; Иглена плоча; Перо; Овчи крак; Връх на копие; Връх Spey; Връх Tanto; Уорнклиф; Други
vi: Thiết kế dao cắm trại: Điểm cắt; Dao găm; Điểm rơi; Mũi kim; Bút; Lưỡi dao thẳng; Mũi nhọn; Lưỡi cắt điểm; Dao tanto; Lưỡi Wharncliffe; Khác
da: Design af jagtknive og overlevelsesknive: Klippunkt; Dolk; Droppunkt; Nålespids; Indelukke; Fårefod; Spydspids; Spejderspids; Tanto-spids; Wharncliffe; Andet
es: Diseño del cuchillo de caza: Punta de clip; Daga; Punta caída; Punta de aguja; Redil; Punta de oveja; Punta de lanza; Punta de Spey; Punta Tanto; Wharncliffe; Otros
hr-HR: Dizajn noža za lov/opstanak: Clip point; Bodež; Drop point; Needle point; Pen; Sheepsfoot; Vrh spear; Vrh spey; Vrh tanto; Wharncliffe; Ostalo
pl: Konstrukcja noża myśliwskiego/survivalowego: Punkt przycięcia; Sztylet; Punkt spadku; Punkt igły; Kojec; Owcza stopka; Harpun; Punkt spey; Punkt Tanto; Wharncliffe; Inne
th: การออกแบบมีดพราน/มีดดำรงชีพ: คลิปพอยต์; มีด; ดรอปพอยต์; นีดเดิ้ลพอยต์; คอก; แบบตีนแกะ; สเปียร์พอยต์; สเปย์พอยต์; ตันโตะพอยต์; วาร์นคลิฟฟ์; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Design de faca de caça/sobrevivência: Clip point; Punhal; Drop point; Placa de agulha; Cercado; Sheepsfoot; Spear point; Spey point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Outro
zh-TW: 狩獵/野外求生刀設計: 刀柄; 匕首; 刀柄; 刀尖; 筆刀; 石洗刀身; 矛尖; 瑞士刀; 武士刀型刀尖; 戰術刀; 其他
el: Σχεδιασμός μαχαιριού κυνηγιού/επιβίωσης: Σημείο κλιπ; Στιλέτο; Σημείο στάξης; Σημείο βελόνας; Pen; Sheepsfoot; Αιχμή; Σημείο Spey; Σημείο Tanto; Wharncliffe; Άλλο
ko: 사냥/생존 나이프 디자인: 클립 포인트; 대거; 드롭 포인트; 니들 포인트; 펜; 쉽풋; 스피어 포인트; 스파이 포인트; 탄토 포인트; 워른클리프; 기타
nb: Design på jakt- og overlevelseskniver: Klippunkt; Dolk; Slipppunkt; Nålespiss; Penn; Sauefot; Spydspiss; Speyspiss; Tanto-punkt; Wharncliffe; Annet
de: Jagd-/Überlebensmesser-Design: Clip point; Dagger; Drop point; Needle point; Pen; Sheepsfoot; Spear Point; Spey Point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Dizajn noža na lov/prežitie: Clip point; Dýka; Drop point; Ihlový hrot; Pero; Sheepsfoot; Spear point; Spey point; Tanto point; Wharncliffe; Iné